Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-275
Hearing; student; testimony.

At a hearing requested under sections 79-268 and 79-269, the student may speak in his or her own defense and may be questioned on his or her testimony, but he or she may choose not to testify and, in such case, shall not be threatened with punishment nor be later punished for refusal to testify.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 19;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 25;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,188;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 79.